Hawaii statutes.
[§602-54] Session, where. The
intermediate appellate court shall sit in Honolulu; provided that the chief
judge may appoint a different place for the sitting of the court, pro tempore.
[L 1979, c 111, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next